Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 16. Dissolution.

§ 13.1-742.
Dissolution by directors and shareholders.

The board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders by first adopting a resolution authorizing the dissolution.

For a proposal to dissolve to be approved:

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interests or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall inform the shareholders of the basis for that determination; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection E.

The board of directors may set conditions for the approval of the proposal for dissolution by shareholders or on the effectiveness of the dissolution.

If the approval of the shareholders is to be sought at a shareholders’ meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, regardless of whether entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which dissolution will be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subsection C, requires a greater vote, a greater quorum, or a vote by voting groups, dissolution to be authorized must be approved at a shareholders’ meeting at which a quorum exists by the holders of more than two-thirds of all votes entitled to be cast on the proposal to dissolve. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subsection or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast by each voting group entitled to vote on the proposed dissolution at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-81; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “of subsection E” at the end of subdivision B 2 and following “subsection C” in the first sentence of subsection E, and in the second sentence of subsection E, deleted “on the proposed dissolution” following “votes cast” and substituted “proposed dissolution” for “transaction.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote this Code section, which read: “A. A corporation’s board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders. B. For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted: 1. The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interests or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and 2. The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection E. C. The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis. D. The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with §

13.1-658

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation. E. Unless the board of directors, acting pursuant to subsection C, requires a greater vote, dissolution to be authorized must be approved by the holders of more than two-thirds of all votes entitled to be cast on the proposal to dissolve. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subsection or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast by each voting group entitled to vote on the proposed dissolution at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.”

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 262; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 5.

§ 13.1-743.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Commission for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date that dissolution was authorized;

Either (i) a statement that dissolution was authorized by unanimous consent of the shareholders, or (ii) a statement that the proposed dissolution was submitted to the shareholders by the board of directors and was approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this article and the articles of incorporation.

If the Commission finds that the articles of dissolution comply with the requirements of law and that the corporation has paid all fees and taxes, and delinquencies thereof, imposed by laws administered by the Commission, it shall issue a certificate of dissolution.

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of the certificate of dissolution.

For purposes of §§

13.1-742

through

13.1-746.2

, “dissolved corporation” means a corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-80 to 13.1-82, 13.1-87, 13.1-88, 13.1-90; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, cc. 522, 528; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

For effect of dissolution of public service corporation, see § 56-13.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section as set out above to Acts 1985, c. 528, which amended former § 13.1-82, the comparable provision in former Chapter 1 of this title.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “approved by the shareholders” for “authorized” in subsection A; substituted “article” for “chapter” in subdivision A 3; and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “authorized” for “approved by the shareholders,” and substituted “delivering to the Commission for filing” for “filing with the Commission”; rewrote subdivision A 3, which read: “Either (i) a statement that dissolution was authorized by unanimous consent of the shareholders, or (ii) a statement that the proposed dissolution was submitted to the shareholders by the board of directors in accordance with this article, and a statement of: a. The designation, number of outstanding shares, and number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on dissolution; and b. Either the total number of votes cast for and against dissolution by each voting group entitled to vote separately on dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for dissolution separately by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for dissolution by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 13.1-744.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution at any time prior to the effective date of its certificate of termination of corporate existence.

Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless that authorization permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the Commission for filing articles of revocation of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect and if dissolution was authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action of the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by subdivision 3 of subsection A of §

13.1-743

.

If the Commission finds that the articles of revocation of dissolution comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of revocation of dissolution.

When the certificate of revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the certificate of dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if the dissolution had never occurred.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-85, 13.1-86; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection C, substituted “delivering to the Commission for filing” for “filing with the Commission”; in subdivision C 4, inserted “a statement to that effect and if dissolution was” preceding “authorized by”; in subsection E, inserted “certificate of” twice; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-745.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Making distributions of its remaining assets among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

Subject its directors to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Article 9 (§

13.1-673

et seq.);

Change (i) quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; (ii) provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers; or (iii) provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

A distribution in liquidation under this section may only be made by a dissolved corporation. For purposes of determining the shareholders entitled to receive a distribution in liquidation, the board of directors may fix a future date as a record date. If the board of directors does not fix a record date for the determination, the record date is the date the board of directors authorizes the distribution.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-83, 13.1-84; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 4, substituted “Making distributions of its remaining assets” for “Distributing its remaining property”; added subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-746.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall deliver to each of its known claimants written notice of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice shall:

Provide a reasonable description of the claim that the claimant may be entitled to assert;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted (i) the amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date, and (ii) any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be delivered;

State the claim deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which written confirmation of the claim must be delivered to the dissolved corporation, and if the claimant’s claim is not admitted, the proceeding deadline, which may not be fewer than 180 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the claimant must commence a proceeding to enforce the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if written confirmation of the claim is not delivered by the claim deadline, or, if the claim is not admitted, if the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim by the proceeding deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved corporation delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection B and the claimant does not deliver written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved corporation by the claim deadline; or

If the dissolved corporation delivered written notice to the claimant that the claimant’s claim is not admitted, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim by the proceeding deadline.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include (i) a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or (ii) a liability or claim the ultimate maturity of which is more than 60 days after the delivery of written notice to the claimant pursuant to subsection B. Nothing in this section shall prevent acceleration of liability for an unmatured claim or liability by operation of the agreement under which it was created or exercise of any discretionary right of the claimant thereunder.

If a liability exists but the full extent of any damages is not or may not be ascertainable, and a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced pursuant to subdivision C 2, the claimant may amend the pleadings after filing to include any damages that occurred or are alleged to have occurred after filing, and the court having jurisdiction of such claim may continue such proceeding during its pendency if it appears that further damages are or may be still occurring.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2008, c. 91; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in subdivision C 1; substituted “90” for “ninety” in subdivision C 2; in subsection D, substituted “60” for “sixty,” and deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” at the end; and deleted “of subsection C of this section” following “C 2” in subsection E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added the last sentence of subsection D.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 substituted “effective date of such notice” for “delivery of written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved corporation” at the end of subdivision C 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 3, substituted “delivered” for “sent”; rewrote subdivisions B 4 and 5, which read: “4. State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which confirmation of the claim must be delivered to the dissolved corporation; and 5. State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written confirmation of the claim is not delivered by the deadline”; in subdivision C 1, inserted “claim” preceding “deadline”; in subdivision C 2, substituted “the claimant’s” for “his,” and substituted “by the proceeding deadline” for “within 90 days from the effective date of such notice”; in subsection E, inserted “not” following “damages is”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-746.1.
Other claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may deliver notice of its dissolution to any known claimant with a liability or claim that pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-746

is not treated as a claim for purposes of §

13.1-746

. A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved corporation present them in accordance with the notice. The notice shall (i) be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located or (ii) be posted conspicuously for at least 30 days on the dissolved corporation’s website. The notice of dissolution shall request that persons with claims against the dissolved corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Describe the information that is required to be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be delivered; and

State that a claim against the dissolved corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the date of delivery of notice to the claimant, or the date of publication of the notice, as appropriate.

If the dissolved corporation provides notice of its dissolution in accordance with this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the publication of the notice:

A claimant who was not given written notice under §

13.1-746

; and

A claimant whose claim pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-746

is not treated as a claim for purposes of § 13.1-746.

A claim that is not barred by subsection C of §

13.1-746

or subsection C of this section may be enforced:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

Except as provided in subsection D of §

13.1-746.2

, if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of the shareholder’s pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to the shareholder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2008, c. 91; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 rewrote subsections A and B, substituted “corporation provides notice of its dissolution in accordance with this section” for “corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection B” and “after the date on which notice was delivered to the claimant or published, as appropriate” for “after the publication date of the newspaper notice” in the introductory paragraph of subsection C, and added the proviso at the end of subdivision C 3.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 deleted “provided that in the case of a known claim the corporation delivered notice of its dissolution in accordance with clause (i) of subsection A of this section” at the end of subdivision C 3.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-746

is not treated as a claim for purposes” for “is excluded from the definition of a claim in subsection D” in subsection A; substituted “pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-746

is not treated as a claim for purposes of § 13.1-746” for “does not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of § 13.1-746” in subdivision C 3; substituted “this section” for “§

13.1-746.1

” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection A, which read: “A dissolved corporation may also (i) deliver notice of its dissolution to any known claimant with a liability or claim that pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-746

is not treated as a claim for purposes of §

13.1-746

and (ii) publish notice of its dissolution one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located. The notice of dissolution shall request that persons with claims against the dissolved corporation present them in accordance with the notice”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “delivered” for “sent”; in subsection C, substituted “publication of the notice” for “date on which notice was delivered to the claimant or published, as appropriate”; deleted former subdivision C 2, which read: “A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; and”; redesignated former subdivision C 3 as 2; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-746.2.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved corporation that has complied with the notice requirements of §

13.1-746.1

may file an application with the circuit court of the city or county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that (i) are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved corporation, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution or (ii) are based on a liability the ultimate maturity of which is more than 60 days after delivery of written notice to the claimant pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-746

. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under subsection C of §

13.1-746

.1.

Within 10 days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved corporation to each known claimant whose claim is covered by the application.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of such guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved corporation.

Provision by the dissolved corporation for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection A shall satisfy the dissolved corporation’s obligations with respect to claims covered by that order, and such claims may not be enforced against a shareholder who received assets in liquidation.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2008, c. 91.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “has complied with the notice requirements of §

13.1-746

.1” for “has published a notice under §

13.1-746

.1,” inserted the clause (i) designator, added clause (ii), and made a related change; substituted “each known claimant whose claim is covered by the application” for “each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved corporation” at the end of subsection B; and substituted “covered by that order” for “that do not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of § 13.1-746” in subsection D.

§ 13.1-746.3.
Director duties.

Directors shall cause the dissolved corporation to apply its remaining assets to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions in liquidation of assets to shareholders after payment or provision for claims.

Directors of a dissolved corporation that has disposed of claims under §

13.1-746

,

13.1-746

.1 or

13.1-746.2

shall not be liable for breach of subsection A with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or satisfied under § 13.1-746,

13.1-746.1

or

13.1-746.2

.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “Directors” for “The board of directors,” and inserted “in liquidation” preceding “of assets.”

§ 13.1-747.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The circuit court in any city or county described in subsection C may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by a shareholder of a corporation that is not a public corporation if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

The shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired; or

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision;

In a proceeding by a shareholder if the corporation has abandoned its business and has failed within a reasonable time to liquidate and distribute its assets and terminate its corporate existence;

Upon application by the board of directors when it is established that circumstances make it impossible to obtain a representative vote by shareholders on the question of dissolution and that the continuation of the business of the corporation is not in the interest of the shareholders but it is in their interest that the assets and business be liquidated; or

When the Commission has instituted a proceeding for the involuntary termination of corporate existence and entered an order finding that the corporate existence of the corporation should be terminated but that liquidation of its business and affairs should precede the entry of an order of termination of corporate existence.

The circuit court in the city or county named in subsection C shall have full power to liquidate the assets and business of the corporation at any time after the termination of corporate existence, pursuant to the provisions of this article upon the application of any person, for good cause, with regard to any assets or business that may remain. The jurisdiction conferred by this clause may also be exercised by any such court in any city or county where any property may be situated whether of a domestic or a foreign corporation that ceased to exist.

Venue for a proceeding brought under this section lies in the city or county where the corporation’s principal office is or was located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is or was last located.

It is not necessary to make directors or shareholders parties to a proceeding to be brought under this section unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with such powers and duties as the court may direct, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Within 15 days of the commencement of a proceeding to dissolve a corporation under subdivision A 1, the corporation shall deliver to all shareholders, other than the petitioner, a notice stating that the corporation and the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner’s shares under §

13.1-749.1

and accompanied by a copy of that section.

a.

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied, and the corporation is insolvent; or

b.

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent;

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-94; 1956, c. 428; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 57; 1968, c. 112; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subsection A; deleted “desirable” preceding “in their interest” in subdivision A 4; in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsection C,” and substituted “chapter or any laws of this Commonwealth in effect at any time prior to January 1, 1986” for “article”; and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 inserted “of a corporation that is not a public corporation” in subdivision A 1, added present subdivision A 4, and redesignated former subdivisions A 4 and A 5 as present subdivisions A 5 and A 6.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 added subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey of business and corporate law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 627 (1991).

For a review of corporate law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 841 (1999).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 264, 266, 268; 15 M.J. Receivers, § 12.

§ 13.1-748.
Receivership or custodianship.

Unless an election to purchase has been filed under §

13.1-749.1

, a court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage while the proceeding is pending, the business and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all its property wherever located.

The court may appoint as a receiver or custodian an individual, a domestic corporation or eligible entity, or a foreign corporation or eligible entity authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale; and (ii) may sue and defend in the receiver’s own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts of the Commonwealth; and

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interest of its shareholders and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-94 to 13.1-96; 1956, c. 428; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 57; 1968, c. 112; 1974, c. 291; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection B and subdivision C 1; and substituted “the custodian’s” for “his” in subsection E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added “Unless an election to purchase has been filed under §

13.1-749.1

” at the beginning of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, inserted “as a receiver or custodian” following “may appoint,” inserted “or eligible entity” following “corporation” twice, and deleted “as a receiver or custodian” preceding “The court”; in subdivision C 1, deleted “if authorized by the court” following “sale,” and substituted “the receiver’s” for “his”; in subsection D, deleted “if doing so is in the best interest of the corporation, its shareholders, and creditors” at the end; in subsection E, substituted “expenses paid or reimbursed” for “expense disbursements or reimbursements made,” and deleted “and the custodian’s counsel”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Receivers, §§ 12, 22.

§ 13.1-749.
Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in §

13.1-747

exist, it may enter a decree directing that the corporation shall be dissolved. The clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Commission, which shall enter an order of involuntary dissolution.

After the order of involuntary dissolution has been entered, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s business and affairs in accordance with §

13.1-745

and the notification of claimants in accordance with §§

13.1-746

,

13.1-746

.1, and

13.1-746.2

. When all of the assets of the corporation have been distributed to its creditors and shareholders, the court shall so advise the Commission, which shall enter an order of termination of corporate existence.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-99; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in the second sentence of subsection B, inserted “13.1-746.1, and

13.1-746.2

” and made a minor stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 264.